District of Columbia statutes.
8-1404

Penalties.

(a)

Violations of this chapter or any rule promulgated pursuant to § 8-1405 shall be adjudicated as provided by Chapter 23 of Title 50.

(b)

The Mayor, by rule, may establish civil fines and penalties for violations of this chapter or any rule promulgated pursuant to § 8-1405.

(c)

(1)

As an alternative sanction, any person who knowingly or willfully violates this chapter, or any rule promulgated pursuant to § 8-1405 shall be subject to a fine of not less than $100 and not more than $10,000, imprisonment not to exceed 1 year for each violation, or both. Each day shall constitute a separate violation and the penalties prescribed shall be applicable to each violation.

(2)

Prosecution for violations of this subsection shall be brought by the Corporation Counsel.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-190, § 5, 35 DCR 8663
Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-173, § 3(c), 39 DCR 5834

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3304.